Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-215.01
Conveyance, defined.

Conveyance means
a motorboat as defined in section 37-1204, a personal watercraft as defined
in section 37-1204.01, a vessel as defined in section 37-1203, a trailer,
or any associated equipment or containers which may contain or carry aquatic
invasive species.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 5.